cs: Směrovost: Kardioidní; Figure-8; Hyperkardioidní; Více vzorů; Všesměrový; Shotgun; Subkardioidní; Superkardioidní; Jiné
hu: Poláris minta: Kardioid; Kétirányú; Hiperkardioid; Többirányú; Mindenirányú; Shotgun; Szubkardioid; Szuperkardioid; Egyéb
it: Figura polare: Cardioide; Figura a 8; Ipercardioide; Multi-modello; Omnidirezionale; Mezzo fucile; Subcardioide; Supercardioide; Altro
da: Polarmønster: Kardioid; 8-tal; Hyperkardioid; Multi-mønster; Omnidirektionel; Shotgun; Subkardioid; Super-kardioid; Andet
pl: Wzorzec biegunowy: Kardioida; Rysunek 8; Hiperkardioidalny; Różne wzory; Wielokierunkowe; Strzelba; Subkardioidalny; Superkardioidalny; Inne
ro-RO: Model polar: Cardioid; Figure-8; Hipercardioid; Multi-model; Omnidirecțional; Pușcă de vânătoare; Subcardioid; Super-cardioid; Altele
es: Patrón polar: Cardioide; Bidireccional; Hipercardioide; Multipatrón; Omnidireccional; Escopeta; Subcardioide; Supercardioide; Otros
tr: Polar Model: Kardioid; Figür 8; Hiperkardioid; Çoklu desen; Çok yönlü; Pompalı tüfek; Subkardioit; Süper kardiyoit; Diğer
zh-TW: 指向性: 心型; 8 字型; 超心型; 多重; 全向式; 霰彈槍; 心形下; 超心形; 其他
fr: Modèle polaire: Cardioïde; Figure 8; Hypercardioïde; Multi-motifs; Omnidirectionnel; Fusil à pompe; Sous-cardioïde; Super-cardioïde; Autre
sk-SK: Polárny vzor: Kardioidný; Obrázok-8; Hyperkardioidná; Viacvzorový; Všesmerový; Brokovnica; Subkardioidný; Super-kardioidný; Iné
de: Richtcharakteristik: Niere; Lissajous-Figur; Hyperniere; Mehrfachmuster; Omnidirektional; Richtrohr; Breite Niere; Superniere; Sonstiges
nl: Polair patroon: Cardioïde; Figure-8; Hypercardioïde; Multi-patroon; Omnidirectioneel; Jachtgeweer; Subcardioïde; Supercardioïde; Andere
vi: Mô hình cực: Cardioid (Hình tim); Hình số 8; Hypercardioid; Nhiều mẫu hình; Đa hướng; Shotgun; Subcardioid; Super-cardioid; Khác
lt-LT: Poliškumas: Kardioidinis; 8 forma; Hiperkardioidinis; Daugiaraštis; Daugiakryptis; Skiltinis; Subkardioidinis; Superkardioidinis; Kita
th: รูปแบบขั้ว: การรับเสียงแบบคาร์ดิออยด์; การรับเสียงแบบเลข 8; การรับเสียงแบบไฮเปอร์คาร์ดิออยด์; การรับเสียงแบบหลายรูปแบบ; การรับเสียงแบบออมนิไดเร็คชันแนล; การรับเสียงแบบช็อตกัน; การรับเสียงแบบซับคาร์ดิออยด์; การรับเสียงแบบซูเปอร์คาร์ดิออยด์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Padrão polar: Cardióide; Figura 8; Hipercardióide; Multipadrão; Omnidirecional; Espingarda; Subcardióide; Supercardióide; Outro
ru: Диаграмма направленности: Кардиоида; Восьмерка; Гиперкардиоида; Мульти-узор; Всенаправленный; Дольная; Субкардиоида; Суперкардиоида; Другая
hr-HR: Polarni uzorak: Kardioida; Osmice; Hiperkardioidni; Višestruki uzorak; Svesmjerni; Sačmarica; Subkardioidni; Superkardioidni; Ostalo
sl-SI: Polarni vzorec: Kardioid; Števka 8; Hiperkardioid; Več vzorcev; Vsesmerna; Šibrenica; Subkardioid; Super-kardioid; Drugo
ko: 극성 패턴: 카디오이드; 8자형; 하이퍼카디오이드; 멀티패턴; 무지향성; 샷건; 서브카디오이드; 슈퍼카디오이드; 기타
fi: Polaarikuvio: Kardioidi; Kahdeksikko; Hyperkardioidi; Monikuvioinen; Pallo; Haulikko; Subkardioidi; Superkardioidi; Muu
pt-PT: Padrão polar: Cardioide; Figura-8; Hipercardioide; Com vários padrões; Omnidirecional; Shotgun; Subcardioide; Supercardioide; Outro
en: Polar pattern: Cardioid; Figure-8; Hypercardioid; Multi-pattern; Omnidirectional; Shotgun; Subcardioid; Super-cardioid; Other
sv: Polarmönster: Kardioid; Figur 8; Hyperkardioid; Flermönster; Rundstrålande; Shotgun; Subkardioid; Super-kardioid; Övrigt
ja: 極性パターン: 単一指向性; 双指向性; ハイパーカーディオイド; マルチパターン; 全指向性; ショットガン; サブカーディオイド; 超指向性; その他
nb: Polarmønster: Kardioid; Figur 8; Hyperkardioid; Flermønstret; Omnidireksjonell; Hagle; Subkardioid; Superkardioid; Annet
bg-BG: Модел на полярност: Кардиоид; Фигура 8; Хиперкардиоид; Множество шарки; Многопосочен; Пушка; Субкардиоид; Суперкардиоид; Други
el: Μοτίβο πόλωσης: Καρδιοειδής; Figure-8; Υπερκαρδιοειδής; Πολλαπλών μοτίβων; Πολυκατευθυντική; Όπλο; Υποκαρδιοειδής; Υπερκαρδιοειδής; Άλλο
zh-CN: 极性模式: 心形; 8 字型; 强超心形; 多模式; 全指向式; 短枪; 次心形; 超心形; 其他